Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-177
Salvage branded certificate of title; sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 60-171 to 60-177 shall be construed to require the actual repair of a wrecked, damaged, or destroyed vehicle to be designated as salvage.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 77.